Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 20 Trespass and Actions for Possession

34-20-1.
Liability for unauthorized cutting of trees or wood.

Every person who shall cut, destroy, or carry away any tree, timber, wood or underwood whatsoever, lying or growing on the land of any other person, without leave of the owner thereof, shall, for every such trespass, pay the party injured twice the value of any tree so cut, destroyed, or carried away; and for the wood or underwood, thrice the value thereof; to be recovered by civil action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 270, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1168; G.L. 1909, ch. 335, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 386, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 588, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-20-1

; P.L. 1965, ch. 72, § 1.

34-20-1.1.
Damages for willful encroachment on state, municipal or nonprofit land conservation organization open space land — Civil action.

Definitions. As used in this section, the following words and terms shall have given to them the meanings set forth below, unless the context indicates another or different meaning or intent.

“Encroach” means to conduct an activity that causes substantial damage or alteration to the land or vegetation or other features thereon, including, but not limited to, erecting buildings or other structures; constructing roads, driveways, or trails; destroying or moving stone walls; cutting trees or other vegetation, other than de minimus cutting; removing boundary markers; installing lawns or utilities; or using, storing, or depositing vehicles, substantial amounts of materials, or debris.

“Nonprofit land conservation organization” means a not-for-profit entity organized with a mission of permanently protecting open-space land for conservation purposes.

“Open-space land” means and includes, but is not limited to, any park, forest, wildlife management area, refuge, preserve, sanctuary, green or wildlife area owned, or held pursuant to a conservation restriction as defined in §

34-39-1

et seq., by the state, a political subdivision of the state, or a nonprofit land conservation organization.

No person may encroach, or cause another person to encroach, on open-space land without permission of the owner of the open-space land or holder of the conservation restriction on the open-space land or without other legal authorization.

Any owner, or holder of a conservation restriction as defined above in open-space land, subject to the provisions of subsection (b), may bring an action in the superior court for the county where the land is located against any person who knowingly and intentionally violates the provisions of subsection (b) with respect to the owner’s land or land subject to the conservation restriction. The court shall order any person who knowingly and intentionally violates the provisions of subsection (b) to restore the land to its condition as it existed prior to the violation or shall award the landowner the costs of the restoration, including reasonable management costs necessary to achieve the restoration. In addition, the court may award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs and injunctive or equitable relief as the court deems appropriate.

In addition to any damages and relief ordered pursuant to subsection (c), the court may award damages of up to five (5) times the cost of restoration or statutory damages of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000). In determining the amount of the award, the court shall consider the willfulness of the violation; the extent of damage done to natural resources, if any; the appraised value of any trees or shrubs damaged, or carried away as determined in accordance with the latest revision of The Guide for Plant Appraisal, as published by the International Society of Arboriculture, Urbana, Illinois, or a succeeding publisher; any economic gain realized by the violator; and any other relevant factors.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 261, § 1.

34-20-2.
Actions to recovery possession — Right of entry.

In actions to recover possession of lands, tenements, or hereditaments, the plaintiff shall not be required to prove an actual entry under his or her title; but if he or she proves entitlement to an estate in the premises, whether as heir, devisee, purchaser, or otherwise, and proves a right of entry therein, this shall be deemed sufficient proof of his or her seisin, as alleged in the complaint; but no action shall be maintained unless the plaintiff has, at the time of commencing the same, a right of entry into the premises.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 404; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 52; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 52; G.L. 1938, ch. 538, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

34-20-2

.

34-20-3.
Action by cotenants.

In actions concerning any estate held or claimed in coparcenary, common or joint tenancy, where the possession of the estate claimed is the object of the action, the same may be commenced by all or any two (2) or more of the coparceners, tenants in common or joint tenants, or the same may be brought by each one for his or her particular share of the estate, and the same rules shall prevail in actions for mesne profits.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 265, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 330, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 381, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 586, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-20-3

.

34-20-4.
Conditional judgment in action by mortgagee.

In every action for possession of any real estate mortgaged, in which the defendant by his or her answer shall aver a right of redemption in himself or herself or in the person under whom the defendant claims, which averment shall not be denied by the plaintiff, or if denied shall be found true, the court shall, by itself or by one or more judicious and disinterested persons appointed by it, ascertain the just sum due on such mortgage; and shall thereupon render a conditional judgment, that if the mortgagor, the mortgagor’s heirs, executors, administrators, or assigns, shall pay unto the plaintiff in such action, or deposit in the clerk’s office for him or her, the sum adjudged due within two (2) months from the time of entering up judgment, with interest, then the mortgage, or deed operating as such, shall be void and discharged; otherwise the plaintiff shall have a judgment for possession.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 434; G.L. 1909, ch. 294, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 344, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 444, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-20-4

.

34-20-5 — 34-20-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 1986, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §§

34-20-5

— 34-20-8; P.L. 1948, ch. 1986, § 3, § 34-20-9; Repealed by P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 3, effective January 1, 1987; P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 30, effective July 5, 1995.

34-20-10.
Unlawful termination of tenancy in general.

When proceedings commenced under this chapter are to regain possession of the premises following the alleged termination of a tenancy, if the defendant alleges in his or her answer and if it appears by a preponderance of the evidence that any of the following situations exist, judgment shall be entered for the defendant:

That the alleged termination was intended as a penalty for the defendant’s justified attempt to secure or enforce rights under a lease or contract, or under the laws of the state or its governmental subdivisions, or of the United States.

That the alleged termination was intended as a penalty for the defendant’s justified complaint to a governmental authority with a report of plaintiff’s violation of any health or safety code or ordinance.

That the alleged termination was intended as a penalty for any other justified lawful act of the defendant.

That the alleged termination was a tenancy in housing operated by a city, town, municipal housing authority, or other unit of a local government, and was terminated without cause.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 55, § 1.

34-20-11.
Termination of tenancy for failure to pay increased rent imposed as penalty.

When proceedings commenced under this chapter are to regain possession of the premises following the alleged termination of a tenancy, if the defendant alleges and it appears by a preponderance of the evidence that the plaintiff attempted to increase the defendant’s obligations under the letting as a penalty for the justified lawful acts described in the preceding section, and that the defendant’s failure to perform the additional obligations was a material reason for the alleged termination, judgment shall be entered for the defendant on the claim of possession, and all the additional obligations shall be void.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 55, § 1.